District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-401

Insecurity: adequate assurance of performance.

(a)

A lease contract imposes an obligation on each party that the other’s expectation of receiving due performance will not be impaired.

(b)

If reasonable grounds for insecurity arise with respect to the performance of either party, the insecure party may demand in writing adequate assurance of due performance. Until the insecure party receives that assurance, if commercially reasonable the insecure party may suspend any performance for which he or she has not already received the agreed return.

(c)

A repudiation of the lease contract occurs if assurance of due performance adequate under the circumstances of the particular case is not provided to the insecure party within a reasonable time, not to exceed 30 days after receipt of a demand by the other party.

(d)

Between merchants, the reasonableness of grounds for insecurity and the adequacy of any assurance offered must be determined according to commercial standards.

(e)

Acceptance of any nonconforming delivery or payment does not prejudice the aggrieved party’s right to demand adequate assurance of future performance.

History

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830

Section References

This section is referenced in § 28:2A-402 and § 28:2A-403.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28:2A-401.

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

Uniform Statutory Source:Section 2-609.

Changes: Revised to reflect leasing practices and terminology. Note that in the analogue to subsection (3) ( Section 2-609(4)), the adjective “justified” modifies demand. The adjective was deleted here as unnecessary, implying no substantive change.

Definitional Cross References: “Aggrieved party”. Section 1-201(2).

“Agreed”. Section 1-201(3).

“Between merchants”. Section 2-104(3).

“Conforming”. Section 2A-103(1)(d).

“Delivery”. Section 1-201(14).

“Lease contract”. Section 2A-103(1)(l).

“Party”. Section 1-201(29).

“Reasonable time”. Section 1-204(1) and (2).

“Receipt”. Section 2-103(1)(c).

“Rights”. Section 1-201(36).

“Writing”. Section 1-201(46).